District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1223.16

Revenue bonds, notes, or other obligations; loans and grants.

Repealed.

History

Dec. 7, 2004, D.C. Law 15-219, § 116, 51 DCR 9142
Sept. 19, 2006, D.C. Law 16-162, § 3, 53 DCR 5397
Mar. 26, 2008, D.C. Law 17-138, § 104(a), 55 DCR 1689

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 116 of Anacostia Waterfront Corporation Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-586, November 1, 2004, 51 DCR 10681).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3 of NCRC and AWC Debt Acquisition Delegation Authority Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-405, June 26, 2006, 53 DCR 5417).